en: Loungewear
xx: Loungewear
cs: Oblečení na doma
da: Fritidstøj
de: Loungewear
es: Ropa cómoda
fr: Vêtements de détente
it: Abbigliamento da camera
ja: ルームウェア
nl: Loungewear
no: Hvileklær
pl: Ubrania na co dzień
pt: Roupas casuais
ru: Одежда для отдыха
sv: Myskläder
tr: Ev Kıyafetleri

en: Nightgowns
xx: Nightgowns
cs: Noční košile
da: Natkjoler
de: Nachthemden
es: Camisones
fr: Chemises de nuit
it: Camicie da notte
ja: ナイトガウン
nl: Nachthemden
no: Nattkjoler
pl: Koszule nocne
pt: Camisolas
ru: Ночные рубашки
sv: Nattlinnen
tr: Gecelikler

en: Pajamas
xx: Pajamas
cs: Pyžama
da: Pyjamas
de: Schlafanzüge
es: Pijamas
fr: Pyjamas
it: Pigiami
ja: パジャマ
nl: Pyama's
no: Pyjamaser
pl: Piżamy
pt: Pijamas
ru: Пижамы
sv: Pyjamasar
tr: Pijamalar

en: Robes
xx: Robes
cs: Župany
da: Badekåber
de: Bademäntel
es: Albornoces
fr: Robes de chambre, Peignoirs, Peignoir
it: Accappatoi
ja: ローブ・バスローブ
nl: Kamerjassen
no: Morgenkåper
pl: Szlafroki
pt: Roupões
ru: Свободные халаты
sv: Morgonrockar
tr: Sabahlıklar

en: Suits
xx: Suits
cs: Obleky
da: Jakkesæt
de: Anzüge
es: Trajes
fr: Costumes et tailleurs, Costumes, Costume
it: Abiti da uomo
ja: スーツ
nl: Pakken
no: Dresser
pl: Garnitury
pt: Ternos
ru: Выходные костюмы
sv: Kostymer
tr: Takım Elbiseler

en: Pant Suits
xx: Pant Suits
cs: Kalhotové kostýmy
da: Buksesæt
de: Anzüge & Hosenanzüge
es: Trajes de pantalón
fr: Costumes et tailleurs à pantalon
it: Tailleur giacca e pantaloni
ja: パンツスーツ
nl: Broekpakken
no: Dresser med bukse
pl: Garnitury ze spodniami
pt: Conjuntos com calça
ru: Брючные костюмы
sv: Kostymer med byxor
tr: Pantolonlu Takım Elbiseler

en: Skirt Suits
xx: Skirt Suits
cs: Kostýmy se sukní
da: Nederdelssæt
de: Kostüme
es: Trajes de falda
fr: Tailleurs-jupes
it: Tailleur giacca e gonna
ja: スカートスーツ
nl: Mantelpakken
no: Dresser med skjørt
pl: Garnitury ze spódnicami
pt: Conjuntos com saia
ru: Юбочные костюмы
sv: Kostymer med kjol
tr: Etekli Takım Elbiseler

en: Tuxedos
xx: Tuxedos
cs: Smokingy
da: Smokinger
de: Smokings
es: Esmóquines
fr: Smokings
it: Smoking e abiti da sera
ja: タキシード
nl: Smokings
no: Smokinger
pl: Smokingi
pt: Smokings
ru: Смокинги
sv: Smokingar
tr: Smokinler

en: Swimwear
xx: Swimwear
cs: Plavky
da: Badetøj
de: Bademode
es: Trajes de baño
fr: Vêtements de bain, Maillots de bain, Maillot de bain
it: Costumi da bagno
ja: 水着
nl: Zwemkleding
no: Badetøy
pl: Stroje kąpielowe
pt: Roupas de banho
ru: Купальные костюмы
sv: Badkläder
tr: Mayolar

en: Traditional & Ceremonial Clothing
xx: Traditional & Ceremonial Clothing
cs: Tradiční a slavnostní oděvy
da: Traditionelt og ceremonielt tøj
de: Traditionelle & Festkleidung
es: Trajes ceremoniales y tradicionales
fr: Vêtements traditionnels et de cérémonie
it: Abbigliamento tradizionale e cerimoniale
ja: 伝統衣装・礼服
nl: Traditionele en ceremoniële kleding
no: Tradisjonsklær og seremoniklær
pl: Stroje tradycyjne i ceremonialne
pt: Roupas tradicionais e para cerimônias
ru: Традиционная и церемониальная одежда
sv: Traditionella och ceremoniella kläder
tr: Geleneksel ve Törenlerde Giyilen Kıyafetler

en: Dirndls
xx: Dirndls
cs: Dirndly
da: Dirndl
de: Dirndl
es: Dirndls
fr: Dirndls
it: Dirndl
ja: ダーンドルスカート
nl: Dirndls
no: Dirndl-drakter
pl: Dirndl
pt: Dirndls
ru: Дирндли
sv: Dirndl
tr: Dirndllar

en: Hakama Trousers
xx: Hakama Trousers
cs: Hakamy
da: Hakama-bukser
de: Hakama-Hosen
es: Pantalones hakama
fr: Pantalons hakama
it: Pantaloni hakama
ja: 袴
nl: Hakama-broeken
no: Hakama-bukser
pl: Spodnie hakama
pt: Calças hakama
ru: Хакама
sv: Hakamabyxor
tr: Hakama Pantolonlar

en: Japanese Black Formal Wear
xx: Japanese Black Formal Wear
cs: Japonské formální černé oděvy
da: Formelt japansk sort tøj
de: Traditionelle japanische formelle Kleidung
es: Indumentaria japonesa negra formal
fr: Kurotomesode
it: Abbigliamento giapponese nero formale
ja: ブラックフォーマル
nl: Japanse zwarte formele kleding
no: Japanske seremoniklær
pl: Odświętne czarne stroje japońskie
pt: Trajes formais pretos japoneses
ru: Японские смокинги
sv: Svart japansk festklädsel
tr: Japon Tipi Siyah Resmi Giysiler

en: Kimono Outerwear
xx: Kimono Outerwear
cs: Svrchní kimona
da: Kimonoovertøj
de: Kimono-Oberbekleidung
es: Prendas para llevar sobre kimono
fr: Vêtements associés au kimono
it: Complementi per kimono
ja: 着物上着
nl: Kimonojassen
no: Kimono-ytterklær
pl: Odzież wierzchnia na kimono
pt: Casaco tipo quimono
ru: Кимоно для улицы
sv: Kimonoytterkläder
tr: Kimono Dış Giyim

en: Haori Jackets
xx: Haori Jackets
cs: Kabáty haori
da: Haori-jakker
de: Haori-Jacken
es: Chaquetas haori
fr: Vestes haori
it: Giacche haori
ja: 羽織
nl: Haori-jassen
no: Haori-jakker
pl: Kurtki haori
pt: Casacos haori
ru: Хаори
sv: Haori
tr: Haori Ceketler

en: Kimono Coats
xx: Kimono Coats
cs: Kabáty na kimona
da: Kimonojakker
de: Kimono-Mäntel
es: Abrigos con forma de kimono
fr: Manteaux kimono
it: Soprabito kimono
ja: 着物コート
nl: Kimono-overjassen
no: Kimono-frakker
pl: Płaszcze na kimono
pt: Casacos de quimono
ru: Пальто-кимоно
sv: Kimonokappor
tr: Kimono Montlar

en: Kimonos
xx: Kimonos
cs: Kimona
da: Kimonoer
de: Kimonos
es: Kimonos
fr: Kimonos
it: Kimono
ja: 着物
nl: Kimono's
no: Kimonoer
pl: Kimona
pt: Quimonos
ru: Кимоно
sv: Kimonor
tr: Kimonolar

en: Bridal Kimonos
xx: Bridal Kimonos
cs: Svatební kimona
da: Brudekimono
de: Hochzeitskimonos
es: Kimonos de novia
fr: Kimonos de mariage
it: Kimono da sposa
ja: 和装花嫁衣裳
nl: Bruidskimono's
no: Brude-kimonoer
pl: Kimona dla panien młodych
pt: Quimonos nupciais
ru: Свадебные кимоно
sv: Brudkimonor
tr: Gelin Kimonoları

en: Casual Kimonos
xx: Casual Kimonos
cs: Neformální kimona
da: Fritidskimono
de: Informelle Kimonos
es: Kimonos informales
fr: Kimonos simples
it: Kimono casual
ja: 普段着用着物
nl: Vrijetijdskimono's
no: Uformelle kimonoer
pl: Zwykłe kimona
pt: Quimonos casuais
ru: Повседневные кимоно
sv: Vardagskimonor
tr: Günlük Kimonolar

en: Furisode Kimonos
xx: Furisode Kimonos
cs: Kimona furisode
da: Langærmet kimono (furisode)
de: Furisode-Kimonos
es: Kimonos furisode
fr: Kimonos furisode
it: Kimono furisode
ja: 振袖
nl: Furisode-kimono's
no: Furisode-kimonoer
pl: Kimona furisode
pt: Quimonos Furisode
ru: Кимоно фурисодэ
sv: Furisodekimonor
tr: Furisode Kimonoları